Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 4 Prohibited Acts — Enforcement
57-3-408. Actions by attorney general to recover fees, taxes, penalties.

Whenever any person licensed under this chapter fails to account for or pay over any license fees or taxes or levies by this chapter provided, or defaults in any of the conditions of the person's bond, or whenever any person, whether licensed hereunder or unlicensed, shall have failed or refused to pay any obligations or liability, forfeiture or penalty imposed by this chapter, the commission shall report the same to the attorney general and reporter, who shall immediately institute the necessary action for the recovery of any such license fee, tax, levy, or any sum due the state of Tennessee by reason of any of the provisions of this chapter, and the district attorney general of the circuit is ordered and directed to assist the attorney general and reporter whenever required.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 42; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-144.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

57-3-409. Investigations by commission.

The commission is authorized to examine the books, papers and records of any wholesaler and dealer in this state for the purpose of determining whether the tax so imposed by this chapter has been fully paid, and shall have the power to investigate and examine, according to law, any premises where any alcoholic beverage is possessed, or stored for the purpose of sale, or sold, for the purpose of determining whether this chapter is being complied with. Any refusal to permit the examination of any of such books, papers, and records, or the investigation and examination of such premises, shall constitute sufficient reason for the revocation of a license or the refusal to issue a license.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.19 (Williams, § 6648.16); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 43; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-145.

57-3-410. Grand jury investigations.

To the end that this chapter may be better enforced, the grand juries of this state shall have and are clothed with inquisitorial power to inquire into and ascertain whether or not there has been any violation of this chapter, and to return indictments in proper cases. It shall be the duty of all circuit and criminal court judges to give this law in their charges to the grand juries of the state, and all sheriffs and other peace officers charged with the enforcement of the laws of the state are also required to enforce this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-146.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

57-3-411. Contraband goods — Property subject to seizure and sale.

All alcoholic beverages as defined in § 57-3-101 which are or shall be owned or possessed by any person in avoidance, evasion or violation of any of the provisions of this chapter are declared to be contraband goods, and the same may be seized by the alcoholic beverage commission, or any duly authorized representative, agent or employee of the commission, without a warrant, and such goods may be delivered to the commission for sale at public auction to the highest bidder after due advertisement. The proceeds of all such seizures shall be paid by the commission into the state treasury, and ten percent (10%) of such proceeds shall be set aside as expenses for the administration of this section.

Any vehicle, not a common carrier, which may be used for transportation for the purpose of distribution, gift or sale of untaxed alcoholic beverages shall likewise be subject to confiscation and sale, in the same manner as above provided. Should any alcoholic beverages in excess of five gallons (5 gals.) be found in any vehicle without receipts or other prescribed documents demonstrating that the tax under this chapter has been paid, the same shall be prima facie evidence that it was there for gift, sale or distribution.

In all cases of seizure of any alcoholic beverages, or other property subject to forfeiture under this chapter, the officer or other person making the seizure shall proceed as follows:

The officer or other person shall deliver to the person, if any, found in possession of such property, a receipt, showing a general description of the seized goods. A copy of the receipt shall be filed in the office of the commission and shall be open to the public for inspection;

All such property seized and confiscated under this chapter may be sold at public sale by the commissioner of general services when the same has been turned over to the commissioner by the commission as now authorized by law;

Any person claiming any property so seized as contraband may within ten (10) days from the date of seizure, file with the commission at Nashville a claim in writing, requesting a hearing and stating the person's interest in the articles seized. The commission shall set a date for hearing within ten (10) days from the day the claim is filed. Any decision of the commission adverse to any claimant may be reviewed in the manner now provided by law for the review of actions of boards or commissions as prescribed by title 27, chapter 9;

In the event the ruling of the commission is favorable to the claimant, the commission shall deliver to the claimant the alcoholic beverages or other property so seized. If the ruling of the commission is adverse to the claimant, the commission shall proceed to sell such contraband goods in accordance with the foregoing provisions of this section, unless the claimant shall secure a supersedeas under § 27-9-106, or unless the claimant shall give a bond under subdivision (c)(3)(B).

When the ruling of the commission is adverse to the claimant, the alcoholic beverages or property so seized shall be delivered to the claimant. Such claimant shall give a bond payable to the state of Tennessee in an amount double the value of the property seized, with sureties approved by the commission. The condition of the bond shall be that the obligors shall pay to the state, through the commission, the full value of the goods or property seized, unless upon certiorari the decision of the commission shall be reversed and the right of the claimant to such property is judicially determined.

If no claim is interposed, such alcoholic beverages or other property shall be forfeited without further proceedings and the same shall be sold as herein provided. The above procedure is the sole remedy of any claimant, and no court shall have jurisdiction to interfere therewith by replevin, injunction or in any other manner.

If, incidental to a confiscation of contraband as defined herein, there is discovered any beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) deemed to be held or transported illegally within the purview of § 57-5-409, or any tobacco products deemed to be held or transported illegally within the purview of § 67-4-1020, the confiscating officer is hereby empowered and required to seize such beer or tobacco, notwithstanding the fact that such officer may not otherwise be empowered to take such action under § 57-5-409 or § 67-4-1020. Any beer or tobacco seized pursuant hereto shall be delivered promptly as provided by § 57-5-409 or § 67-4-1020, whichever is appropriate, to the department of revenue for sale or disposition as contraband in accordance with chapter 5 of this title or title 67, chapter 4, part 10, whichever is appropriate.

In all cases of seizure or confiscation of property under this chapter where the commission does not sell such property at public auction, the commission may destroy such property after resolution of the criminal or administrative process; provided, that the property is of nominal value in comparison to the cost of a public sale.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.20 (Williams, § 6648.22); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1959, ch. 301, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 45; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 68, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-147; Acts 1992, ch. 608, §§ 9-11; 2009, ch. 434, § 10; 2014, ch. 861, § 6; 2017, ch. 147, §§ 15, 17, 18.

Cross-References. Sale on execution, §26-5-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 15, 26, 28.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

57-3-412. Criminal offenses — Penalties — Perjury — Expunction of records — Enforcement of law — Violations by and relating to minors.

Except as otherwise provided, a violation of this chapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

If any person shall, or shall attempt to, forge or counterfeit, or cause or permit to be forged or counterfeited, any stamp, die, plate, official signature, certificate, evidence of tax payment, license, or other instrument which has been provided or may be hereafter provided, made or used in the pursuance of the execution of this chapter as aforementioned, upon any paper or other material, or shall stamp or mark, or cause to be stamped or marked, any paper, or other material by such forged or counterfeited stamp, die, plate, official signature, certificate, evidence of tax payment, license or other instrument as aforementioned, or shall forge the name or signature of any officer, commissioner, deputy officer, or employee under this chapter or under the rules and the regulations of the commission, or cause the same to be done, or forge or counterfeit, or cause or permit to be forged or counterfeited, any evidence of the payment of any tax provided for in this chapter, with intent to defraud the state of any of the taxes imposed by this chapter, or any provision thereof, or shall in any otherwise, by imitating, restoring, altering, or reusing any stamp or other written evidence of the payment of such taxes knowingly defraud or attempt to defraud the state, or have or retain in such person's possession any of such stamps which are forged or counterfeited, or any such evidence of such payment, or any stamp which has been altered, restored or counterfeited with intent to defraud the state, such person shall be punished for criminal conspiracy.

It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years to have in such person's possession or to consume any intoxicating liquor or beer for any purpose, whether the same be possessed or consumed in a dry county or a wet county. It is unlawful for any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to transport any intoxicating liquor or beer for any purpose, whether the same be transported in a dry or wet county; provided, that this section shall not be construed as prohibiting any person eighteen (18) years of age or older from transporting, possessing, selling or dispensing intoxicating liquor or beer in the course of such person's employment. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(3), “beer” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 57-6-102.

A violation of subdivision (a)(3)(A) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age found to have violated this subdivision (a)(3) shall, regardless of the final disposition of such violation, have the right to have the records, as defined in § 40-32-101, of such violation destroyed after the passage of six (6) months from the date of the violation. Such destruction shall occur upon motion of the person to the court which heard the violation and shall be without cost to such person. No violation of this subdivision (a)(3) may at any time be used against the violator in any criminal proceeding.

Any person who purchases an alcoholic beverage for or at the request of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction for such person's first such offense, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), plus all penalties imposed by § 39-15-404. Upon a person's second or subsequent conviction for such offense, such person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), plus all penalties imposed by § 39-15-404.

It is unlawful for any person who is younger than twenty-one (21) years of age to purchase or attempt to purchase any alcoholic beverage.

A violation of this subdivision (a)(5) is a Class A misdemeanor.

In addition to any criminal penalty established by this section, a court in which a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older is convicted of the purchase or attempt to purchase or possession of alcoholic beverages in violation of this section shall prepare and send to the department of safety, driver control division, within five (5) working days of the conviction, an order of denial of driving privileges for the offender.

The court and the department shall follow the same procedures and utilize the same sanctions and costs for a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older as provided in title 55, chapter 10, part 7, for offenders younger than eighteen (18) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or older.

The members of the highway patrol shall be authorized and it shall be their duty to assist the county and municipal police authorities to enforce this chapter, and any other chapter relating to the manufacture, sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages, as defined in § 57-3-101, in any county or municipality, failing to adopt the rights granted under the various provisions of this chapter.

Inspectors, agents or officers appointed by the commission shall be cloaked with and have the duty, power and authority to exercise the same functions and duties as conferred by law upon the highway patrol in the illegal traffic of intoxicating liquors. Inspectors, agents and officers of the commission shall have concurrent authority with the highway patrol in the enforcement of title 55, chapters 7-10 and 50 for the express purpose of enabling the commission properly to enforce the laws and regulations pertaining to traffic in alcoholic beverages.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age who knowingly makes a false statement or exhibits false identification to the effect that the person is twenty-one (21) years old or older to any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining the same commits a misdemeanor. In addition to any criminal penalty established by this subsection (c), a court in which a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older is convicted under this subsection (c) of a second or subsequent offense shall prepare and send to the department of safety, driver control division, within five (5) working days of the conviction, an order of denial of driving privileges for the offender for a period not to exceed one (1) year. The offender may apply to the court for a restricted driver license. The judge shall order the issuance of a restricted motor vehicle operator's license, in accordance with § 55-50-502. The court and the department shall follow the same procedures and utilize the same costs for a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older as provided in title 55, chapter 10, part 7, for offenders younger than eighteen (18) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or older.

If the person violating this subsection (c) is less than eighteen (18) years of age, that person shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00) and not less than twenty (20) hours of community service work, which fine or penalty shall not be suspended or waived. The fine imposed by this subdivision (c)(1) shall apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

If the person violating this subsection (c) is eighteen (18) years of age or older but less than twenty-one (21) years of age, that person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment in the county jail or workhouse for not less than five (5) days nor more than thirty (30) days. The penalties imposed by this subdivision (c)(2) apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.21 (Williams, § 6648.18); Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1963, ch. 223, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 46; 1967, ch. 148, § 1; 1970, ch. 398, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-148; Acts 1984, ch. 1006, §§ 6, 11, 12, 17; 1985, ch. 321, § 1; 1986, ch. 758, § 2; 1986, ch. 788, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 62, 111, 113; 1991, ch. 473, § 1; 1992, ch. 608, § 12; 2003, ch. 375, § 1; 2006, ch. 900, § 4; 2006, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989 amended the provisions of §57-3-412(a) relative to violation of local option traffic in intoxicating liquors, but contained no reference to purchases by underaged persons, specified in subdivision (a)(4), or for direct purchases by underaged persons, specified in subsection (c).

Cross-References. Eighteen-year-olds, legal responsibility, alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under 21, §1-3-113.

False representations by minors, §§57-4-203,57-5-301.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Purchase or possession by minors, §57-4-203.

Sales to minors prohibited, §57-4-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1963 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 977.

Attorney General Opinions. Destruction of records—juvenile court—alcohol violations by a minor, OAG 92-68 (12/28/92).

57-3-413. Criminal trespass charge in violation of § 39-14-405.

A person may be charged with a violation of § 39-14-405, if the person is:

Between eighteen (18) and twenty-one (21) years of age;

Visibly intoxicated; or

Otherwise disruptive; and

Such person is asked by the owner or employee of an establishment that is licensed as a retail package store pursuant to § 57-3-204 to leave the premises, and that person remains on the premises.

If a person is a minor under eighteen (18) years of age and is asked by the owner or employee of an establishment that is licensed as a retail package store pursuant to § 57-3-204 to leave the premises, and the minor remains on the premises, such minor commits a delinquent act.

Acts 2012, ch. 899, § 1.

57-3-414. Sale of powdered or crystalline alcohol prohibited — Offense — Penalties.

No person shall sell or offer for sale for human consumption powdered or crystalline alcohol.

Subsection (a) does not apply to any of the following:

Any substance regulated by the food and drug administration in the United States department of health and human services that is not either of the following:

Beer or intoxicating liquor; or

A compound that could be converted into beer or intoxicating liquor;

A medication that requires a prescription; or

An over-the-counter medication.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor. In addition to any criminal penalty imposed by this subsection (c), the commission may suspend or revoke any license or permit issued under this title held by any person who violates subsection (a).

As used in this section:

“Over-the-counter medication” means medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a prescription;

“Powdered or crystalline alcohol” means a product that is manufactured into a powdered or crystalline form and that contains any amount of alcohol; and

“Prescription” means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state.

Acts 2015, ch. 311, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.